dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- nassa; nas; 2 -->
    <pardef n="nas/sa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- niċċa; niċ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="niċ/ċa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ċa</l>
          <r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eċ</l>
          <r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għafrid; għ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għ/afrid__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afrid</l>
          <r>afrid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>efiered</l>
          <r>afrid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xilpa; xil; 2 -->
    <pardef n="xil/pa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pa</l>
          <r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
          <r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġolġol; ġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġ/olġol__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olġol</l>
          <r>olġol<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lieġel</l>
          <r>olġol<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dawl; d; 2 -->
    <pardef n="d/awl__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>awl</l>
          <r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wal</l>
          <r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pexxun; p; 3 -->
    <pardef n="p/exxun__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>exxun</l>
          <r>exxun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>xaxen</l>
          <r>exxun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>xiexen</l>
          <r>exxun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ingassa; ingas; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ingas/sa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għama; għ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għ/ama__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>ama<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omja</l>
          <r>ama<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- difer; d; 2 -->
    <pardef n="d/ifer__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ifer</l>
          <r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiefer</l>
          <r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għoqda; għoq; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għoq/da__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- rassa; ras; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ras/sa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- rħis; rħ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="rħ/is__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żerriegħa; ż; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ż/erriegħa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erriegħa</l>
          <r>erriegħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieragħ</l>
          <r>erriegħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bezzun; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/ezzun__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezzun</l>
          <r>ezzun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ziezen</l>
          <r>ezzun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċavetta; ċ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/avetta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avetta</l>
          <r>avetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wievet</l>
          <r>avetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kurkett; k; 2 -->
    <pardef n="k/urkett__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urkett</l>
          <r>urkett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieket</l>
          <r>urkett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħabel; ħ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ħ/abel__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abel</l>
          <r>abel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bula</l>
          <r>abel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- umbrella; umbrel; 2 -->
    <pardef n="umbrel/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tarġa; tar; 2 -->
    <pardef n="tar/ġa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ġa</l>
          <r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xerqa; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/erqa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erqa</l>
          <r>erqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieraq</l>
          <r>erqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- molla; mol; 2 -->
    <pardef n="mol/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ol</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- senter; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/enter__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enter</l>
          <r>enter<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nieter</l>
          <r>enter<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- froġa; fr; 2 -->
    <pardef n="fr/oġa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oġa</l>
          <r>oġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjeġ</l>
          <r>oġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="nassa"><i>nas</i><par n="nas/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="niċċa"><i>niċ</i><par n="niċ/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għafrid"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/afrid__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xilpa"><i>xil</i><par n="xil/pa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġolġol"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/olġol__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dawl"><i>d</i><par n="d/awl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pexxun"><i>p</i><par n="p/exxun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ingassa"><i>ingas</i><par n="ingas/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għama"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ama__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="difer"><i>d</i><par n="d/ifer__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għoqda"><i>għoq</i><par n="għoq/da__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rassa"><i>ras</i><par n="ras/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rħis"><i>rħ</i><par n="rħ/is__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żerriegħa"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/erriegħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bezzun"><i>b</i><par n="b/ezzun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċavetta"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/avetta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kurkett"><i>k</i><par n="k/urkett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħabel"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/abel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="umbrella"><i>umbrel</i><par n="umbrel/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tarġa"><i>tar</i><par n="tar/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xerqa"><i>x</i><par n="x/erqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="molla"><i>mol</i><par n="mol/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="senter"><i>s</i><par n="s/enter__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="froġa"><i>fr</i><par n="fr/oġa__n_GD"/></e>
